Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:(1) An advisory committee for a five-year statewide economic development plan is established with at least 16 members, who must reflect the geographic, racial, and ethnic diversity of the state and be inclusive of historically marginalized communities. The advisory committee may be expanded to add additional representatives to include emerging or rapidly growing economic sectors. These representatives may be added on an as-needed basis, as determined by the director, to ensure comprehensive and adaptive representation of key economic drivers essential to the state's long-term economic development. The advisory committee must include:(a) One representative from the department's office of economic development and competitiveness, who shall be appointed by the director and serve as chair;(b) Two representatives and two senators, representing each of the four caucuses;(c) One representative of the governor's office;(d) The director of the workforce training and education coordinating board, as provided in RCW 28C.18.020, or the director's designee;(e) The director of the department of ecology, as provided in RCW 43.21A.050, or the director's designee; and(f) At least eight representatives appointed by the director, representing an associate development organization, port, labor council, research institution, the department's office of tribal relations, the department's small business resiliency network, and industry associations representing key economic sectors including retail, technology, manufacturing, agriculture, and hospitality and tourism.(2) The members of the advisory committee may be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(3) The members of the advisory committee shall serve two-year terms and may be reappointed.(4) The department must convene an advisory committee every five years, beginning in 2025, to:(a) Provide guidance to the department identifying priorities and recommendations for a five-year statewide economic development plan;(b) Meet at least three times during the first plan development year, and quarterly in the first plan development year for updated plans;(c) Hold at least four public meetings in different regions of the state to solicit input on the priorities and recommendations during the plan development year;(d) Advise the department on policy recommendations to implement the five-year economic development plan; and(e) Review and provide guidance on recommended legislation to implement the five-year economic development plan priorities within one year after the proposal under subsection (7) of this section is provided.(5) The advisory committee must be staffed by the department.(6) The department must consult with the following for feedback on the criteria and content of the five-year statewide economic development plan prior to the third meeting of the advisory committee:(a) The state commission on Hispanic affairs, created in chapter 43.115 RCW;(b) The commission on African American affairs, created in chapter 43.113 RCW;(c) The state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs, created in chapter 43.117 RCW;(d) The women's commission, created in chapter 43.119 RCW;(e) The office of minority and women's business enterprises, created in chapter 39.19 RCW; and(f) The employment security department, created in Title 50 RCW.(7) The department must use the advisory committee's guidance and recommendations, public input, and commission and agency consultations to develop a final proposal for a five-year statewide economic development plan. The proposal must include long-term goals and measurable benchmarks. The department must provide the first proposal with recommended legislation to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by November 30, 2025. The department must provide updated proposals every five years thereafter.(8) The department must provide recommended legislation, if any, to implement the five-year statewide economic development plan by June 30, 2026, and every five years thereafter.(9) The department must provide a progress report on implementation of the five-year statewide economic development plan to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor two years after providing the proposal under subsection (7) of this section.(10) The department must comply with the requirements of RCW 43.18A.020 in making appointments provided in this section. The department must provide the report required in RCW 43.18A.030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect May 5, 2025.--- END ---